Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-633
Median crossover, defined.

Median crossover shall mean a connection between roadways of a divided highway the use of which may permit a vehicle to reverse its direction by continuously moving forward.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 129.